dev/mehweb.twol
Alphabet

  а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӏ
  А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я ӏ

  %{и%}:0 %{и%}:и
  %{а%}:0 %{а%}:а
  %{т%}:т 

  %>:0 ;

Sets

Vow = а е ё и о у ы э ю я ;

VowRight = е ё ю я ;

VowSimple = а и о у э ; 

Cns =  б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь ӏ
       Б В Г Д Ж З Й К Л М Н П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь ӏ ;

Rules

! If a stem ends in a vowel, the vowel is dropped. The [a] of the penultimate syllable
! changes to [u] 16 .

"Final stem vowel deletion with plural in -{т}"
Vx:0 <=> _ %>: %{т%}: ; 
     where Vx in VowSimple ; 

!@ д:д у:у б:б у:у р:р а:0 >:0 {т}:т

"Penultimate [a] changes to [u] before plural in -{т}" 
а:у <=> Cns _ [ Cns Vow: ] %>: %{т%}: ; 

!@ б:б у:у р:р г:г ь:ь а:у л:л а:0 >:0 {т}:т

! 2) One-syllable words form the plural stem by attaching the morpheme -a-.

"Attach morpheme -а- after monosyllabic stem"
%{а%}:а <=> .#. Cns Vow Cns+ %>: _ ; 

!@ к:к у:у н:н г:г > {а}:а н:н е:е 

"Remove oblique -и- after vowel"
%{и%}:0 <=> Vow %>: _ ; 


!дубура<pl><abs>:дубура>{т}
!устар<pl><abs>:устар>{т}
!бургьала<pl><abs>:бургьала>{т}
!гӏабул<pl><abs>:гӏабул>{т}
